Maryland, session 2026, HB0497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
4–505.
(a) (1) (i) If, after a hearing on a petition, whether ex parte or otherwise, a
judge finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a person eligible for relief has
been abused, the judge may enter a temporary protective order to protect any person
eligible for relief from abuse.
– 1 –

Ch. 791 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the temporary
protective order shall be effective for not more than [7] 14 days after service ISSUANCE of
the order.
(2) The judge may extend the temporary protective order as needed, but
not to exceed 6 months, to effectuate service of the order where necessary to provide
protection or for other good cause.
(3) If the court is closed on the day on which the temporary protective order
is due to expire, the temporary protective order shall be effective until the second day on
which the court is open, by which time the court shall hold a final protective order hearing.
4–506.
(a) A respondent under § 4–505 of this subtitle shall have an opportunity to be
heard on the question of whether the judge should issue a final protective order.
(b) (1) (i) The temporary protective order shall state the date and time of
the final protective order hearing.
(ii) Except as provided in § 4–505(c) of this subtitle, or unless
continued for good cause, the final protective order hearing shall be held no later than [7]
14 days after the temporary protective order is served on the respondent ISSUED.
(d) The final protective order may include any or all of the following relief:
(13) award temporary possession of any pet of the person eligible for relief
or the respondent; [or]
(14) ORDER THE RESPONDENT TO PAY TO A PERSON ELIGIBLE FOR
RELIEF, BY A DATE FIXED BY THE COURT, ANY LOSSES OR EXPENSES INCURRED AS
A DIRECT RESULT OF THE ABUSE, INCLUDING:
(I) MEDICAL, DENTAL, OR MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT
COSTS;
(II) COSTS TO REPAIR OR REPLACE DAMAGED PROPERTY;
(III) FOOD, TEMPORARY SHELTER, OR RELOCATION COSTS;
(IV) TRANSPORTATION COSTS;
(V) FILING FEES AND COURT COSTS; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 791
(VI) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES; OR
[(14)] (15) order any other relief that the judge determines is necessary to
protect a person eligible for relief from abuse.
(L) A MONETARY AWARD UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(14) OF THIS SECTION
DOES NOT PRECLUDE A PETITIONER FROM BRINGING A SUBSEQUENT CLAIM FOR
ADDITIONAL LOSSES OR EXPENSES NOT AWARDED IN THE FINAL PROTECTIVE
ORDER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –